test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_piegga_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  
  Noun - pieggâ:
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Nom: piegˊgâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Gen: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Acc: piegâ
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Ill: piegân
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Loc: piegâst
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Com: piegˊgáin
    pieggâ+N+Sg+Abe: pieˊgâttáá
    pieggâ+N+Ess: piegˊgân
    pieggâ+N+Par: piegˊgâd
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Nom: piegah
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Gen: [piegâi, pieˊgâi]
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Acc: piegâid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Ill: piegˊgáid
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Loc: piegâin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Com: pieˊgâiguin
    pieggâ+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊgâittáá
  
